Utah statutes.
78B-7-201.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Abuse" means physical abuse or sexual abuse.

(2)  "Court" means the district court or juvenile court.

(3)  All other terms have the same meaning as defined in Section 78A-6-105.

